Illinois, session 104th, HB3329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 13-202.4 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/13-202.4 new)7    Sec. 13-202.4. Adult sex offense revival. Notwithstanding 8any provision of law that imposes a period of limitation to the 9contrary, every civil claim or cause of action brought against 10any party alleging intentional or negligent acts or omissions 11by a person for physical, psychological, or other injury or 12condition suffered as a result of conduct which would 13constitute a sex offense under Article 11 of the Criminal Code 14of 2012 committed against a person who was 18 years of age or 15older, or incest committed against a person who was 18 years of 16age or older, which is barred as of the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly because the 18applicable period of limitation has expired, is hereby 19revived, and action thereon may be commenced not earlier than 206 months after, and not later than 18 months after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 22Assembly. In any such claim or action, dismissal of a previous 23action, ordered before the effective date of this amendatory   HB3329- 2 -LRB104 05657 JRC 15687 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly, on grounds that such 2previous action was time barred, shall not be grounds for 3dismissal of a revival action under this Section.4    The procedure for this Section shall be in accordance with 5the Supreme Court's rules.